Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 11. Rural Development.

Administrative Code. —

For rural development assistance and bulk fuel storage facility grant programs, see 3 AAC 160.

Sec. 44.33.740.
Powers and duties.

To promote development of rural areas of the state, the department is authorized to

investigate social and economic conditions of rural areas to determine the need to expand economic opportunities and improve living conditions;

formulate a coordinated program to broaden and diversify the economic base of rural areas;

coordinate administration of emergency relief, surplus food distribution, or other public assistance programs, except the regular relief and assistance programs of the federal government in rural areas;

formulate and conduct a program of construction of basic facilities to improve health, welfare, and economic security and provide employment and income in the rural areas;

promote training and educational programs designed to expand employment opportunities for residents of rural areas;

enter into agreements with other state agencies and departments to provide for the distribution in rural communities of surplus electrical power from state-owned power sources located in those communities and to expend funds for this purpose;

make grants to communities for bulk fuel storage facilities;

cooperate with the Department of Environmental Conservation and other agencies to provide technical assistance to communities in the installation, operation, and management of bulk fuel storage facilities.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For farm and agricultural land, see 3 AAC 138.

For rural development assistance and bulk fuel storage facility grant programs, see 3 AAC 160.

Sec. 44.33.745.
Limitations.

A program of the department under AS

44.33.740

in a rural area may not exceed $100,000 in cost a year.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For rural development assistance and bulk fuel storage facility grant programs, see 3 AAC 160.

Sec. 44.33.750.
Bulk fuel storage facilities grant fund.

There is established in the department the bulk fuel storage facilities grant fund. Grants may be made by the department from this fund to a community to acquire and install community bulk storage facilities.

Grants made under this section for the acquisition and installation of a bulk fuel storage facility may not exceed $100,000 per community.

If the governing body of two or more communities determine that their fuel requirements may be served by a single bulk fuel storage facility, the communities may jointly apply for grants to acquire and install a single bulk fuel storage facility. When communities apply jointly under this subsection, the limitation in (b) of this section is multiplied by the number of communities that submit the joint application.

Before a grant is made under this section, the city council or, if the community is not incorporated, a reasonable representative body in the community shall agree in writing to maintain and operate the bulk storage facility to be constructed with the proceeds of the grant.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.755.
Land conveyed in trust.

The commissioner

shall accept, administer, and dispose of land conveyed to the state in trust by village corporations under 43 U.S.C. 1613(c)(3) (Sec. 14(c)(3) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) for the purposes specified in that section;

may, with the concurrence of an appropriate village entity recognized by the commissioner under (b) of this section or, in the absence of an appropriate village entity, under procedures prescribed by regulations of the commissioner, accept, administer, and dispose of land conveyed in trust by a state or federal agency and by the dissolution of a municipality under AS

29.06.450

—

29.06.530

.

Transfer of land by sale, lease, right-of-way, easement, or permit, including transfer of surface resources, may be made by the commissioner only after approval of an appropriate village entity such as the traditional council, a village meeting, or a village referendum. This approval shall be by resolution filed with the department.

Within one complete state fiscal year after the incorporation of a municipality in the village or of a municipality that includes all or part of the village, land acquired under this section shall be conveyed without cost to the municipality, and the municipality shall succeed to all the entrusted interest in the land.

Separate accounts shall be maintained in the name of each village for the land, including the revenue from the land, acquired from each village corporation under this section.

Upon the conveyance of land to a municipality under this section, the commissioner shall account to the municipality for all profits including interest generated from the land. The municipality may then request the governor to submit a request to the legislature for an appropriation for the amount due the municipality.

Title to or an interest in land acquired by the department under this section may not be acquired by adverse possession or prescription. Notwithstanding (a) — (e) of this section, on the dissolution of a municipality under AS

29.06.450

—

29.06.530

, unimproved land that was owned by the municipality on the date of its dissolution and received by the municipality from the state under a municipal land grant entitlement program is transferred to the commissioner of natural resources.

For the purposes of this section, “municipality” includes only first and second class cities incorporated under the laws of the state.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For tender, acceptance, and conveyance of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 1.

For official recognition of village entities under
AS

44.33.755(b)

, see 3 AAC 190, art. 2.

For ascertaining the views of village residents where no organized village entity is recognized, see 3 AAC 190, art. 3.

For management of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 4.

For disposal by state of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 5.

For disposition of land and funds upon incorporation of a municipality in a native village, see 3 AAC 190, art. 6.

Sec. 44.33.760.
Loan information officers.

The department may provide itinerant loan information officers to serve persons who reside outside the major population centers of the state.

The loan information officers shall be trained, to the extent that the department considers necessary, in a program administered by the department and approved by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, and the principal departments of the executive branch that administer loan programs.

A majority of the loan information officers shall be persons who are conversant in Alaska Native languages that are spoken by a significant number of Alaska Natives. The department shall provide brochures and other printed materials, written in easily understandable English and in the Alaska Native languages that are spoken by a significant number of Alaska Natives, for distribution by the loan information officers. The brochures and printed materials must explain the purposes of the various state loan programs, the minimum qualifications under the programs, the method for obtaining assistance in the completion of applications for the programs, and other information the department determines will improve the access of persons in rural areas to the state’s loan programs.

The department shall coordinate its efforts under this section with local financial institutions and community groups to determine the proper itinerary and travel schedule of the loan information officers and to provide adequate notice to persons in rural areas of the itinerary and travel schedule of the loan information officers.

The department shall assign the loan information officers to rural areas based on the current and potential future demands for loans in those areas and shall establish offices for the loan information officers in rural areas if the department determines it is necessary to provide familiarity with the area served by the loan information officers and to reduce travel costs.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Secs. 44.33.765 — 44.33.775.
Rural development initiative fund; rural development loans; disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure. [Repealed, § 15 ch 117 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 44.33.780.
Definitions.

In AS

44.33.740

—

44.33.780

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 63 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.